Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB555.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 407, 408, 409 and 410 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended to read:Section 407. Oath of Judge of Election.--The following shall be the oath of each judge of election:"I [(John Doe)] (individual's name) do swear (or affirm) that I will as judge duly attend the ensuing election (or primary) 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 during the continuance thereof, and in cooperation with the inspectors, faithfully carry on the same; that I will not give my consent to the admission of any person to vote, except such as I firmly believe to be registered and entitled to vote at such election (or primary), according to the provisions of the Constitution and laws of this Commonwealth, and that I will use my best endeavors to prevent any fraud, deceit or abuse in carrying on the same, and that I will make a true and perfect return of the said election (or primary), and will at all times impartially and faithfully perform my duty respecting the same, to the best of my judgment and ability; and that I am not directly or indirectly interested in any bet or wager on the result of this election (or primary)."Section 408. Oaths of Inspectors of Election.--The following shall be the form of the oath to be taken by each inspector:"I [(John Doe)] (individual's name) do swear (or affirm) that I will as an inspector duly attend the ensuing election (or primary) during the continuance thereof, and that I will not admit any person to vote, except such as I shall firmly believe to be registered and entitled to vote at such election (or primary), according to the provisions of the Constitution and laws of this Commonwealth, that I will not vexatiously delay or refuse to permit any person to vote whom I shall believe to be entitled to vote as aforesaid, that I will make a true and perfect return of the said election (or primary), and that I will in all things truly, impartially and faithfully perform my duties therein, to the best of my judgment and ability; and that I am not directly or indirectly interested in any bet or wager on the result of this election (or primary)."Section 409. Oaths of Clerks of Election.--The following 20250SB0555PN0549 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be the form of the oath to be taken by each clerk:"I [(John Doe)] (individual's name) do swear (or affirm) that I will as a clerk attend the ensuing election (or primary) during the continuance thereof, that I will carefully [and], truly [record the number of votes that shall be given for each candidate at the election (or primary) as often as his name shall be read to me by the judge or inspectors thereof,] and faithfully execute my duties as poll worker as required by my county in this Commonwealth to ensure a free and fair election. I will ensure that each voter in my precinct who is registered to vote is able to do so. If there is any question about the voter's eligibility to vote, I will direct the voter to the Judge of Elections to resolve the issue with them in a fair and prompt manner and in all things truly and faithfully perform my duty respecting the same to the best of my judgment and ability; and that I am not directly or indirectly interested in any bet or wager on the result of this election (or primary)."Section 410. Oath of Machine Inspectors.--The following shall be the form of the oath to be taken by each machine inspector:"I [(John Doe)] (individual's name) do swear (or affirm) that I will as a machine inspector attend the ensuing election (or primary) during the continuance thereof, that I will in all things truly and faithfully perform my duty respecting the same to the best of my judgment and ability; and that I am not directly or indirectly interested in any bet or wager on the result of this election (or primary)."Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0555PN0549 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728